Delaware, session 153, SB332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2121, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2121. Number and registration plates; provision for the issuance of special license plates to the owners of motor vehicles who operate amateur radio stations; special vanity plates. ( l ) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the owner of a special vanity license plate may transfer the plate to a new owner as a gift or for consideration. A transfer under this subsection ( l ) is not considered a new issuance or a re-issuance of a special vanity license plate.